apertium-sme-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="vei/e__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ede</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ete</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ede</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ete</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="øv/e__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rå__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>det</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>det</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dede</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dete</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dede</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dete</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dende</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>de</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>des</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>det</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>der</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>des</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>det</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/ølge__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ulgt</l>      <r>ølge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulgt</l>      <r>ølge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulgte</l>     <r>ølge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulgte</l>     <r>ølge<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølgende</l>   <r>ølge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ølg</l>       <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølge</l>      <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølges</l>     <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulgt</l>      <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølger</l>     <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølges</l>     <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulgte</l>     <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ven/ne__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nende</l>     <r>ne<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nes</l>       <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>       <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nes</l>       <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="anerkjenne">	 <i>anerkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="godkjenne">       <i>godkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="veie">            <i>vei</i><par n="vei/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="rå">              <i>rå</i><par n="rå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="områ"><i>områ</i><par n="rå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="samrå"><i>samrå</i><par n="rå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilrå"><i>tilrå</i><par n="rå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="begynne">         <i>begyn</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kreve">           <i>krev</i><par n="vei/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="oppleve">         <i>opplev</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="overleve">        <i>overlev</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="følge">           <i>f</i><par n="d/ølge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="nøye">            <i>nøy</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="prøve">           <i>prøv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="røde">            <i>rød</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="leve">            <i>lev</i><par n="vei/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kjenne">          <i>kjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjennomprøve">    <i>gjennomprøv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="etterleve">       <i>etterlev</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="klede">           <i>kled</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="høve">            <i>høv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="løyve">           <i>løyv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="overveie">        <i>overvei</i><par n="vei/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bøye">            <i>bøy</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="streve">          <i>strev</i><par n="vei/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="andøve"><i>andøv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="avfeie"><i>avfei</i><par n="vei/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="behovsprøve"><i>behovsprøv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bløde"><i>blød</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dryge"><i>dryg</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="duge"><i>dug</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="erkjenne"><i>erkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="etterprøve"><i>etterprøv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forkynne"><i>forkyn</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fortøye"><i>fortøy</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forunne"><i>forun</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forvenne"><i>forven</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="frikjenne"><i>frikjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gjennomleve"><i>gjennomlev</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gjøde"><i>gjød</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gradbøye"><i>gradbøy</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="grøde"><i>grød</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="innleie"><i>innlei</i><par n="vei/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="juge"><i>jug</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kjøve"><i>kjøv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kløyve"><i>kløyv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kvæve"><i>kvæv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="leive"><i>leiv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="miskjenne"><i>miskjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="miskunne"><i>miskun</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="neie"><i>nei</i><par n="vei/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nyve"><i>nyv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="påskjønne"><i>påskjøn</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rettkjenne"><i>rettkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rettleie"><i>rettlei</i><par n="vei/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skjenne"><i>skjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skjønne"><i>skjøn</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skruve"><i>skruv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="smøye"><i>smøy</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="spenne"><i>spen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tenne"><i>ten</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tilkjenne"><i>tilkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tøye"><i>tøy</i><par n="vei/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="underkjenne"><i>underkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="utleie"><i>utlei</i><par n="vei/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="utprøve"><i>utprøv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vedkjenne"><i>vedkjen</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="venne"><i>ven</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="øve"><i>øv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forfølge"><i>forf</i><par n="d/ølge__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="behøve">          <i>behøv</i><par n="øv/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fraråde">         <i>fraråd</i><par n="vei/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="påminne">         <i>påmin</i><par n="ven/ne__vblex_adj"/></e>
